Hawaii, session 2025, GM1261.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. Chapter 514B, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
2 amended by adding a new section to subpart C of part VI to be
3 appropriately designated and to read as follows:
4 "§514B- Governing documents; electronic copies. (a)
5 Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary in the
6 declaration, bylaws, or house rules, an association shall
7 provide an electronic copy of its governing documents, as
8 amended or restated, to a unit owner or the unit owner's
9 authorized agent, upon request, at no cost to the unit owner or
10 the unit owner's authorized agent.
11 (b) For the purposes of this section, "governing
12 documents" means the declaration; bylaws; covenants, conditions,
13 and restrictions; and house rules."
14 SECTION 2. Section 514B-154.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
15 amended as follows:
16 1. By amending subsection (b) to read:
2025-2816 SB385 CDl SMA.docx
1
■iimiiiinniiiiiiiiiniiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO. S.,
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
1 "(b) Subject to section 514B-105(d), and except as
2 provided under section 514B- , copies of the items in
3 subsection (a) shall be provided to any unit owner or owner's
4 authorized agent upon the owner's or owner's authorized agent's
5 request; provided that the owner or owner's authorized agent
6 pays a reasonable fee for duplication, postage, and stationery[—
7 and othej? administrative- costo aDOOciutod with—handling the
8 request]."
9 2. By amending subsection (d) to read:
10 "(d) [Any] Except as provided under section 514- , any
11 documents, records, and information, whether maintained, kept,
12 or required to be provided pursuant to this section or section
13 514B-152, 514B-153, or 514B-154, may be made available
14 electronically to the unit owner or owner's authorized agent if
15 the owner or owner's authorized agent requests such in writing."
16 SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
17 and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
18 SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2816 SB385 CDl SMA.docx

385
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rcl day of June ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAl‘1

S.B. No. 385, S.D. 1, H.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
sident of the Senate
Clerk of the Senate
24

SB No. 385, SD 1,HD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives